New York, session 2025-2026, A733.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2307 of the public health law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and no prosecution or 3 action shall be commenced or continued pursuant to section 2307 of the 4 public health law as repealed pursuant to section one of this act on or 5 after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02064-03-5